Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 86. LANDS--PUBLIC

CHAPTER 7. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Art. 5415e-4. DREDGE MATERIALS ACT.

Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act may be cited as the Dredge Materials Act.

Sec. 2. POLICY. (a) It is the declared policy of the state to seek, to the fullest extent permissible under all applicable federal law or laws, the delegation to the state of the authority which the corps of engineers exercises under Section 404, as defined in this Act, over the discharge of dredged or fill material in the navigable waters of the State of Texas.

(b) It is the declared policy of the state that the state should not duplicate the exercise of such authority by the corps of engineers, but should instead exercise such authority in lieu of the corps of engineers, so that no permit application is subject to duplicate levels of regulation.

Sec. 3. DEFINITIONS. As used in this Act, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) "Agency" means the Texas Water Quality Board.

(b) "Agreement" means a written agreement or contract between the State of Texas and the United States, authorizing the State of Texas, through (name of an existing agency), to regulate the discharge of dredged or fill material in the navigable waters of the state under the authority granted by Section 404, as defined in this Act.

(c) "Corps of engineers" means the United States Army Corps of Engineers.

(d) "Discharge of dredged or fill material" has the same meaning as it has in Section 404 as defined in this Act.

(e) "Navigable waters" has the same meaning within the boundaries of the State of Texas as it has in Section 404 as defined in this Act.

(f) "Section 404" means Section 404, Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 (33 U.S.C. Section 1344), as it may be amended, and such regulations as may be from time to time promulgated thereunder.

Sec. 4. LIMITATIONS. (a) Nothing in this Act shall be construed as authorizing any state agency or political subdivision to regulate the discharge of dredged or fill material in the navigable waters of the state in any manner different from or inconsistent with the requirements of Section 404.

(b) Nothing in this Act shall be construed as authorizing any state agency or political subdivision to regulate the discharge of dredged or fill material in the navigable waters of the state:

(1) by the corps of engineers;

(2) by persons operating under contract with the corps of engineers;

(3) when the corps of engineers certifies that such discharge is incidental to a project undertaken by the corps of engineers or persons operating under contract with the corps of engineers, and that such incidental discharge was announced and reviewed at the same time and under the same conditions as such project; or

(4) by cities which own and operate deepwater port facilities, or by navigation districts or port authorities, or by persons operating under contract with such cities, navigation districts, or port authorities, when such discharges are part of or incidental to a navigation project to be paid for with public funds or when such navigation project is to be owned by such cities, navigation districts, or ports.

(c) Nothing in this Act shall be construed as authorizing any state agency or political subdivision to regulate the discharge of dredged or fill material in the navigable waters of the state in any manner unless and until an agreement as described in this Act is validly entered into and in effect.

(d) Nothing in this Act shall be construed as authorizing any state agency or political subdivision to exercise any authority under this Act except in accordance with an executive order of the governor.

(e) Nothing in this Act shall be construed as authorizing any state agency or political subdivision to regulate the discharge of dredged or fill material in the navigable waters of the state in any manner different from, or inconsistent with, the agreement described in this Act.

(f) Nothing in this Act shall be construed as affecting any application for a permit from the corps of engineers to discharge dredged or fill material in the navigable waters of the state if such application is received by the corps of engineers or postmarked before the effective date of the agreement described in this Act.

Sec. 5. AGREEMENT. (a) The governor is hereby authorized to enter into an agreement on behalf of the State of Texas, with the United States, acting through its authorized officials, under the terms of which the agency will regulate the discharge of dredged or fill material in the navigable waters of the state.

(b) The governor is expressly authorized to include whatever terms and conditions in such agreement he may deem to be in the best interest of the state, including provisions regarding the termination of such agreement.

(c) The authority of the governor under the Act to enter into such an agreement shall not be delegated.

(d) The legislature expressly finds that the provisions of this section are necessary to enable the governor to carry out his responsibilities under this Act.

Sec. 6. NOT SEVERABLE. The provisions of this Act are expressly declared not to be severable, and if any provision of this Act shall be found to be invalid, the entire Act shall be null and void and of no further force or effect.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1906, ch. 759, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Art. 5421b. WITHDRAWAL FROM MARKET OF LANDS ADJACENT TO CADDO LAKE.

Sec. 1. All public land lying beneath or adjacent to the waters of Caddo Lake in Marion, Harrison and adjoining counties, and all such public lands heretofore sold by the State that may hereafter revert to the State and become a part of the public domain, be and the same is hereby withdrawn from the market and the title thereto shall remain in the State of Texas to be enjoyed by the public for fishing and hunting and for State park purposes as may hereafter be provided by Law; and the Land Commissioners is hereby directed to offer no portion of said land for sale nor to receive any bids therefor.

Sec. 2. The Commissioner of the General Land Office may lease any or all of said land for mineral purposes, as now provided by Law, but before the same shall be leased it shall be advertised in some newspaper published at Marshall or Jefferson Texas, stating what land is to be leased and the prices offered therefor; and such advertisement shall invite other and additional bids thereon, and the lease shall only be made to the highest bidder.

Acts 1929, 41st Leg., p. 430, ch. 198.

Art. 5421b-1. LEASING FOR MINERALS OF LANDS UNDER AND ADJACENT TO CADDO LAKE AND TRIBUTARIES.

Sec. 1. All or any part of the Public Lands belonging to the State situated in and under the bed of Caddo Lake and the tributaries thereto and all or any part of such lands adjacent thereto shall be subject to lease for mineral development by the Commissioner of the General Land Office to any person, firm or corporation in accordance with the provisions of existing or future laws pertaining to the leasing and development of all islands, salt-water lakes, bays, inlets, marshes and reefs, owned by the State within tidewater limits, and that portion of the Gulf of Mexico within the jurisdiction of Texas, and all unsold public free school land, both surveyed and unsurveyed, in so far as same are not in conflict herewith.

Sec. 2. The development and operation upon the lands included herein shall be conducted so far as practicable in such manner as to prevent such pollution of the water as will destroy fish or wildlife. The Commissioner of the General Land Office, with the advice and assistance of the Game and Fish Commission, shall prescribe and enforce such rules and regulations as may be necessary for that purpose.

Acts 1955, 54th Leg., p. 844, ch. 311.

Art. 5421c. REGULATING SALE AND LEASE OF SCHOOL LANDS, PUBLIC LANDS AND RIVER BED; BOARD OF MINERAL DEVELOPMENT CREATED.

Sec. 8-A. The beds of rivers and channels belonging to the State shall be subject to development by the State and to lease or contract for the recovery of petroleum oil and/or natural gas, in tracts of such size as may from time to time be determined by the hereinafter created board, subject to the conditions contained in this Section.

Subsection 6b. As to any and each lease and/or contract heretofore made by the Board of Mineral Development, such Board shall be, and it is hereby, authorized and empowered to revise the same, with the consent of the lessees and/or contracting parties thereunder, their heirs, successors or assigns, in such wise as to subject such lease and/or contract thenceforth to the public policy declared in Subsection 6a. Such revision shall be accomplished by supplemental or modificatory instrument on such terms as the Board of Mineral Development may deem fair and advantageous to this State, but only after a proposal for such revision shall be formally made, in a public document, to the said Board of Mineral Development, by the lessees and/or contracting parties under such lease and/or contract, their heirs, successors or assigns; and provided that in consideration of the consent by such lessees and/or contracting parties, their heirs, successors or assigns, to such revision the Board of Mineral Development shall not reduce the State's share of the oil and/or gas to be received in the future under such lease and/or contract to less than one-fourth of the gross production of oil and/or gas from the land described in such lease and/or contract.

Provided that any revision made under this Act as referred to hereinbefore shall contain in such supplemental or modificatory instrument the power and authority on the part of the Board of Mineral Development to re-instate any money requirement or reduced royalty requirement at any time that in the opinion of the Board such re-instatement should, in view of the then existing conditions and fairness to the State of Texas under the original lease or contract, be made; and the Board of Mineral Development shall exercise such power whenever in its opinion the interest of the State of Texas requires the exercise of such power; provided, further that said Board may modify said contract as aforesaid by adjusting up or down from time to time the State's portion of said oil and/or money payment as the conditions hereinbefore set forth may justify and which may be equitable to the State and to said contractors or their assigns, but in no event shall the State's portion be less than one-fourth nor more than now provided in said contracts, and in no event shall the Board of Mineral Development have any authority to modify or change said original leases as to gas. Provided, further that no revision made under this Act shall release the lessees or their assigns from the payment to the State for any oil and/or gas produced or the delivery to the State of any oil produced and due the State under the original contracts and produced prior to the effective execution of any revision hereunder.

Provided further, that nothing in such revision shall in anywise relieve any lessee and/or contracting party from any obligation now existing to drill any well either as an offset or otherwise.

"And/or" as used in this Act shall mean and include both and either of the words "and" and "or."

Subsection 6c. No change shall be made by the Board of Mineral Development that will relieve, release and/or suspend the lessees from the payment of any money and/or royalty now due and payable to the State for oil and/or gas produced to the date that the Board makes any change in the present existing lease contracts.

Acts 1931, 42nd Leg., p. 452, ch. 271; Acts 1931, 42nd Leg., 2nd C.S., p. 64, ch. 40; Acts 1933, 43rd Leg., p. 192, ch. 88; Acts 1933, 43rd Leg., p. 309, ch. 120, Sec. 1, 1a; Acts 1939, 46th Leg., p. 465, Sec. 1; Acts 1941, 47th Leg., p. 596, ch. 365, Sec. 1; Acts 1943, 48th Leg., p. 453, ch. 301, Sec. 1; Acts 1953, 53rd Leg., p. 77, ch. 57, Sec. 1; Acts 1957, 55th Leg., p. 434, ch. 209, Sec. 1; Acts 1977, 65th Leg., ch 871, art. I, Sec. 2(a)(1), eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Art. 5421c-4. EASEMENTS OR SURFACE LEASES OF GULF LANDS TO UNITED STATES FOR NATIONAL DEFENSE; AUTHORITY OF SCHOOL LAND BOARD.

Sec. 1. The School Land Board, created by House Bill No. 9 of the Forty-sixth Legislature (being Title: Public Lands, Chapter 3, of the General Laws of the Forty-sixth Legislature, 1939,) is hereby authorized to grant and issue easements or surface leases to the United States of America in accordance with the conditions hereinafter set out, on any island, salt water lake, bay, inlet, or marsh within tidewater limits, and that portion of the Gulf of Mexico within the jurisdiction of the State of Texas, to be used exclusively for any purpose essential to the National Defense.

Sec. 2. When the proper authority or agency of the United States of America shall make application to the School Land Board describing the area which is deemed necessary for use in the National Defense said Board shall issue an easement or surface lease to the United States of America granting and conveying to it the free and uninterrupted use of the area described. Provided that before such lease or leases be granted in any county that the Board shall notify the County Judge of said county and shall fix a date for hearing at which time all interested persons may be heard in protest or otherwise. Such easement or surface lease shall be effective only so long as the area is used for the purpose of National Defense, and it shall cease and terminate and the State of Texas shall be revested with full title and possession of the area when same is no longer used for such purpose.

Sec. 3. The easements or surface leases granted hereunder shall be upon the express condition that the State of Texas shall retain all of the oil, gas, and other mineral rights in and under the area affected. The consideration to be paid for the use of said areas shall be agreed upon by the School Land Board and the United States of America and it shall be payable to the State of Texas on an annual basis.

Sec. 4. All leases for grazing purposes heretofore issued by the Commissioner of the General Land Office which are covered or partially covered by any easement or surface lease granted hereunder are hereby made subordinate to such easement or surface lease. If the lessee under any existing oil and gas lease heretofore granted by the State on any area affected by an easement or surface lease granted hereunder, shall file or cause to be filed in the General Land Office an agreement, subordinating to the easement or surface lease granted hereunder all rights held by such lessee under such oil and gas lease, then and in that event the running of both the primary and principal terms of such lease shall be suspended during the existence of such easement or lease; provided, however, that lessee continues the annual rental payment stipulated in the lease during such suspended period. Such oil and gas lease shall remain in status quo, and all obligations, duties, rights and privileges existing under such lease shall be inoperative and of no force and effect until the expiration of said easement or surface lease, at which time said oil and gas lease shall again become operative and all of the obligations, duties, rights and privileges, including the payment of rentals under same, shall again attach and be in force as they were on the date of the suspension and continue for the unexpired term of such lease. The School Land Board shall give notice immediately to such lessees that their leases are again in force when said easement or surface lease has terminated; provided, however, that the annual rental payments have been met.

Sec. 5. All areas on which there now exists oil, gas, or other mineral production are specifically excluded from the terms of this Act.

Acts 1941, 47th Leg., p. 20, ch. 10.

Art. 5421c-6. PATENTS VALIDATED. All patents issued prior to the effective date of Article 5421-c as amended by House Bill No. 9 of the Forty-sixth Legislature, such effective date being September 21, 1939, by the authority of the State, under the seal of the State and of the Land Office, signed by the Governor and countersigned by the Commissioner of the General Land Office to parties who for a period of ten (10) years prior to the date of application for the patent had held and claimed the same in good faith, under the provisions of Section 5 of Chapter 271, Acts of the Forty-second Legislature, Regular Session, are hereby ratified and title validated and confirmed in such patentees, their heirs or assigns, subject only to the mineral reservation as contained in Section 4, Chapter 271, Acts of the Forty-second Legislature, Regular Session, and without regard to whether or not such land was located within five (5) miles of a well producing oil or gas in commercial quantities at the time of such patent.

Acts 1943, 48th Leg., p. 368, ch. 247, Sec. 1.

Art. 5421d. PATENTS TO LANDS FORMERLY CLAIMED AS IN NEW MEXICO.

Sec. 1. That the Commissioner of the General Land Office is authorized and requested to prepare and issue, and the Governor is authorized to execute and deliver, patents for the lands and accretions thereto, heretofore claimed by New Mexico to be in that state, but determined by the Supreme Court of the United States by Decree entered April 9, 1928 (New Mexico against Texas, 276 U.S. 556) to be in Texas, to the persons who, on April 9, 1928, were in actual bona fide possession of said lands and claiming title to such lands under patent from the United States.

Sec. 2. In order to receive a patent under this Act, the person desiring such patent shall first make written application to the Commissioner of the General Land Office, describing the land for which a patent is sought and shall show in such application the facts necessary under this Act to entitle applicant to a patent hereunder, and the applicant shall verify the allegations in the application by any accompanying Affidavit, stating that such allegations are true to the best of the knowledge and belief of the applicant, and it shall be necessary that any such application be filed in the office of the Commissioner of the General Land Office within five (5) years from the date upon which this Act goes into effect, and the applicant shall, upon filing said application, deposit with the Commissioner of the General Land Office One Dollar ($1.00) for each acre or fractional part of an acre in the land covered by the application, which shall constitute the purchase price for said land, and upon the delivery of any patent to any person under this Act, the purchase price shall be applied to the Public School Fund of the State of Texas.

Sec. 3. It is further provided that any land acquired by the patent issued under this Act shall be subject to the same liens other than liens for taxes and water and like quasi public charges that would have been against such land had it been in New Mexico.

Sec. 4. It is provided that patents issued under this Act shall be merely quitclaims, and the title conveyed by such patents shall be subject to any prior conveyances by this State, and the patents shall so read.

Sec. 5. As used in this Act, the term "person" applies to and includes an individual, corporation, partnership, or association.

Acts 1933, 43rd Leg., p. 634, ch. 212.

Art. 5421f-2. REINSTATEMENT OF CLAIMS TO LANDS FORFEITED UNDER ARTICLE 5326. The purchasers or their vendees, heirs or legal representatives who have used, occupied, and made improvements on lands prior to the date of forfeiture, and which lands have been forfeited under the provisions of Article 5326, Revised Civil Statutes of Texas as amended by said House Bill No. 56; and who shall have, within six months after the expiration of the five year limitation period provided for reinstatement in Section 3 of said House Bill No. 56, and prior to January 1, 1947, paid or tendered payment to the Commissioner of the General Land Office of all delinquent interest, accompanied by written requests for reinstatement, may have their claims reinstated by renewing such requests and paying all delinquent interest up to the date of reinstatement.

Acts 1941, 47th Leg., p. 351, ch. 191, Sec. 3-A, added Acts 1947, 50th Leg., p. 275, ch. 169, Sec. 1.

Art. 5421j. GRANT OF FILLED IN LAND TO CITY OF CORPUS CHRISTI.

Sec. 1. All right, title and interest of the State of Texas in and to all land within the area hereinafter mentioned, hitherto lying and situated under the waters of Corpus Christi Bay for and in consideration of the sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000) cash, is hereby relinquished, confirmed and granted unto the said City of Corpus Christi, its successors and assigns, for public purposes, to-wit:

Being all of that filled-in land lying and being situated in Nueces County, Texas, landward behind the seawall and easterly of the shoreline of Corpus Christi Bay as shown in Survey No. 803 and in the patent from the State of Texas to the City of Corpus Christi, Texas, said patent being dated January 4, 1924, and being Patent No. 86, Volume 21-A.

Sec. 2. All exchanges, sales and conveyances hitherto made by the City of Corpus Christi of property within the area described in Section 1 are hereby ratified; and such property is confirmed, relinquished and granted unto the respective assignees of the City of Corpus Christi, and to their heirs, successors, and assigns, without limitation as to the use thereof to be made by them.

Sec. 3. All exchanges of property, sales of property and conveyances thereof that may be made in the future by the City of Corpus Christi of property, within the area described in Section 1, that has been laid out and platted into lots, blocks or tracts for uses of private ownership as shown on a plat of the Bay Front Plan of said City of Corpus Christi, on file in the General Land Office of Texas and that may be necessary to adjust the titles and boundaries between the City and other owners are hereby authorized and said City of Corpus Christi is hereby empowered to make such exchanges, sales and conveyances; and all such property as may be so exchanged, sold and conveyed, is hereby confirmed, relinquished and granted unto the respective assigns of the City of Corpus Christi, and to their heirs, successors and assigns forever, without limitation as to use thereof to be made by them.

Sec. 4. The consideration for this land shall be paid to the Commissioner of the General Land Office of the State of Texas for the benefit of the Permanent Public Free School Fund; and a patent to said lands shall be issued to the City of Corpus Christi by the Governor and the Commissioner of the General Land Office of the State of Texas. Upon the payment of the said consideration and the issuance of said patent, the title of the City of Corpus Christi to the said lands shall become absolute, subject to the reservations herein made.

Sec. 5. All mines and minerals, and the mineral rights including oil and gas are hereby specially reserved to the State under that part of said area described in Section 1, which has been filled, laid out and constructed for use by the City of Corpus Christi as streets, public drives, parks, boulevards, and seawall, and all minerals and mineral rights under the remainder of said land are hereby relinquished and released unto the City of Corpus Christi and its assigns.

Sec. 6. This Act shall be and is cumulative of all former grants and authorities from the State of Texas to the City of Corpus Christi.

Acts 1945, 49th Leg., p. 391, ch. 253.

Art. 5421j-1. LEASE OF FILLED IN LAND BY CITY OF CORPUS CHRISTI.

Sec. 1. All property transferred by the State of Texas to the City of Corpus Christi by the provisions of Chapter 253, Acts of the 49th Legislature, Regular Session, 1945, and Chapter 68, General Laws, Acts of the 36th Legislature, Regular Session, 1919, may be leased by the governing body of the City of Corpus Christi for such time and under such terms and conditions and for such purposes as determined by the governing body of the City of Corpus Christi to be to the best interest of the city, including the public purposes provided by Section 52-a, Article Iii, Texas Constitution, and Section 380.001(a), Local Government Code. The governing body of the City of Corpus Christi shall lease such property in accordance with the procedure prescribed by the charter of the City of Corpus Christi for leasing lands owned by the city.

Acts 1957, 55th Leg., p. 488, ch. 235.

Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 988, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Art. 5421j-2. LEASE BY CITY OF CORPUS CHRISTI OF SUBMERGED LANDS PREVIOUSLY RELINQUISHED TO CITY BY STATE.

Sec. 1. The City of Corpus Christi is hereby authorized and given the power and authority to lease those certain submerged lands described in Section 4 herein and heretofore relinquished by the State of Texas to the City of Corpus Christi, to any person, firm or corporation, owning lands, land fill or shore area adjacent to the described submerged lands, without restriction as to public or private use thereof, upon whatever terms and conditions the governing body of the City of Corpus Christi deems proper, for any period or term not to exceed fifty (50) years.

Sec. 2. The rights and appurtenances vesting in a Lessee of the City of Corpus Christi in and to those submerged lands shall be limited only by such limitations as might be imposed in the lease which the City of Corpus Christi deemed proper and in the best interest of the City of Corpus Christi; provided that any lease shall contain a provision prohibiting the Lessee, or assigns thereof, from erecting or maintaining thereon any structure or structures, such as buildings, with the exceptions of yacht basins, boat slips, piers, dry-docks, breakwaters, jetties or the like; and provided further that the right to use the waters embraced by the lease shall be reserved to the public, though the boat slips, piers, dry-docks, and the like may be limited to the private use of the Lessee.

Sec. 3. The power and authority granted hereunder to the City of Corpus Christi with respect to the submerged lands described in Section 4 may be exercised only after local referendum election at which a majority of those qualified and voting favor approving the passage of the ordinance authorizing such lease.

Sec. 4. This Act pertains to a strip of submerged land having dimensions of 500 feet by approximately 2050 feet, having as its West line the East line of the C.G. Glasscock 22.39 acre tract (as such tract is reflected on the map or plat prepared by J.M. Goldston under his certificate of September 8, 1954, and being a survey of the C.G. Glasscock property attached as Exhibit "A" to exchange deed between the City of Corpus Christi, Texas, and the said C.G. Glasscock dated February 2, 1955, recorded in Volume 674, Page 193 of the Deed Records of Nueces County, Texas); having as its East line a line run parallel to and 500 feet East of (measured at right angles) the East line of the C.G. Glasscock 22.39 acre tract above referred to; having as its South line an Easterly projection of the South line of the C.G. Glasscock 22.39 acre tract above referred to from the Southeast corner of said tract (identified by new 2" I.P.) to the point of intersection with the East line above referred to; and having as its North line an Easterly projection of the center line of Buford Street commencing with a new 2" I.P. located at the intersection of the extension of the center line of Buford Street with the East line of the C.G. Glasscock 22.39 acre tract and continuing along a projection of said center line to the point of intersection with the East line of this tract as above defined.

Sec. 5. This Act shall not be construed to grant or convey to the City of Corpus Christi the title to any oil, gas or other mineral which was not already owned by the City of Corpus Christi at the enactment hereof.

Sec. 6. If any laws or parts of laws are in conflict with the provisions of this Act, then the provisions of this Act shall control.

Acts 1961, 57th Leg., p. 1184, ch. 536.

Art. 5421k. SUBMERGED LANDS ACROSS NUECES BAY AND PASS CONVEYED TO STATE HIGHWAY COMMISSION.

Sec. 1. In order that the Texas Transportation Commission may have title to and control of the more or less submerged right of way necessary for the construction and maintenance of a proposed Causeway and its Approaches, across Nueces Bay and the Pass connecting Nueces Bay and Corpus Christi Bay in San Patricio and Nueces Counties, as described in Section 2 of this Act, and as shown on the right of way map on file in the Texas Department of Transportation at Austin, Texas, and entitled, Control 101-5 & 6 in San Patricio and Nueces Counties, Causeway across Nueces Bay and the Pass connecting Nueces Bay with Corpus Christi Bay on Highway U. S. 181 from Beach Drive in Portland, San Patricio County, and North Beach in Corpus Christi, Nueces County, the State hereby conveys title to and control of the submerged right of ways described in Section 2 of this Act, and as shown on the right of way map above stated, but no part of this Act is to be construed so as to interfere nor conflict with the rights and authority of the Parks and Wildlife Commission, except that the Texas Transportation Commission shall have the full right and authority to take and use, at any time and in any quantity desired, any and all materials within the limits of these tracts, and is exempted from the payment of any and all compensation for any and all materials taken therefrom.

Sec. 2. Field Notes of a survey of 385.638 acres, more or less, of submerged lands and tidewater flats, and situated under the waters of Nueces Bay between Engrs. centerline Sta. 774/50 and Sta. 991/20, about Latitude 27° 51' North and Longitude 97° 22' West, taken from U.S.C. & G.S. Chart No. 1117, and being more particularly described as follows:

[Detailed description omitted.]

Acts 1947, 50th Leg., p. 162, ch. 101.

Sec. 1 amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 22(16), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Art. 5421k-1. CONVEYANCE OF LANDS TO WIDEN STATE HIGHWAY NO. 24 IN DENTON COUNTY.

Sec. 1. In order that the expansion and improvement program of the State Highway Commission may be carried forward in an orderly and expeditious manner the title to and control of that certain narrow strip of land consisting of six (6) separate tracts or parcels and being 4.89 acres, more or less, owned by the State of Texas and the Texas State College for Women, are hereby transferred and conveyed to the Texas Highway Commission for the widening and material improvement of State Highway No. 24 in Denton County, Texas, from North Locust Street in the City of Denton easterly to the Denton-Collin County Line, as shown on the right-of-way map on file in the State Highway Department at Austin, Texas, and more particularly described as follows, to wit:

[Detailed description omitted.]

Sec. 2. The fact that the improvement and widening of State Highway No. 24 from a point on North Locust Street in the City of Denton easterly to the Denton-Collin County Line has been long delayed because of the inability of the State Highway Commission to obtain the right of way necessary for the widening and improvement of such Highway, creates an emergency and imperative public necessity that the Constitutional Rule requiring bills to be read on three separate days in each House be suspended, and said Rule is hereby suspended, and this Act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage, and it is so enacted.

Acts 1947, 50th Leg., p. 268, ch. 164.

Art. 5421k-2. SUBMERGED RIGHT-OF-WAY ACROSS CAYO DEL OSO IN NUECES COUNTY, CONVEYANCE TO STATE HIGHWAY COMMISSION.

Sec. 1. In order that the Texas Transportation Commission may have title to and control of the more or less submerged right of way necessary for the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of the Causeway and its Approaches across Cayo del Oso in Nueces County, as described in Section 2 of this Act, and as shown on the right-of-way map on file in the Texas Department of Transportation at Austin, Texas, and entitled Project ARMR 5A(1) Control 617-1-1, State Highway No. 358, Nueces County, from U. S. Naval Air Base on Encinal Peninsula to Junction with State Highway No. 286, the State hereby conveys to the Texas Transportation Commission title to and control of the submerged right of way described in Section 2 of this Act, and as shown on the right-of-way map above stated, but no part of this Act is to be construed so as to interfere nor conflict with the rights and authority of the Parks and Wildlife Commission, except that the Texas Transportation Commission shall have the full right and authority to take and use, at any time and in any quantity desired, any and all materials within the limits of this tract, and is exempted from the payment of any and all materials taken therefrom; provided, however, that all mineral rights, together with the right to explore for and develop same by directional drilling are reserved to the State of Texas.

Sec. 2. The conveyance hereby made shall consist of a tract of more or less submerged land and tidewater flats, situated under the waters of Cayo del Oso between Engineers centerline Station 130 + 32.8 and Station 169 + 54.0 of State Highway No. 358, said tract being a strip of land 1000 feet wide, 500 feet on each side of the centerline of this right-of-way survey which extends from the Flour Bluff Naval Station to Junction with State Highway No. 286, 3.65 miles south of Corpus Christi, said tract extending for a distance of 3921.2 feet, the centerline being more particularly described as follows:

[Detailed description omitted.]

Acts 1957, 55th Leg., p. 16, ch. 12.

Sec. 1 amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 22(17), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Art. 5421k-3. SALE OF LAND IN CAYO DEL OSO TO CITY OF CORPUS CHRISTI; VALIDATION.

Sec. 1. CONFIRMATION AND VALIDATION OF SALE. The sale by the State of Texas to the City of Corpus Christi of 986.97 acres of land in Nueces County, known as Tract C, as shown on a map entitled Sheet No. 1, Laguna Madre, Subdivision for Mineral Development, dated November 1, 1948, and revised September 12, 1951, by addition of Cayo Del Oso Subdivision, which land is described by metes and bounds in that certain patent heretofore issued to said City, being Patent No. 158, Volume 29-B, dated June 11, 1959, is hereby in all things confirmed and validated so that all right, title and interest of the State of Texas in and to all of the land described in said patent, submerged and unsubmerged, shall be and is hereby relinquished, confirmed and granted unto the City of Corpus Christi, its successors and assigns, and such land shall be vested in the City of Corpus Christi subject only to the conditions, limitations and restrictions contained and imposed by the provisions of this Act, which shall entirely supersede the conditions and restrictions referred to in said patent.

Sec. 2. RESERVATION OF MINERALS AND MINERAL RIGHTS TO STATE FOR PERMANENT SCHOOL FUND. All minerals and mineral rights in, on and under said land are hereby reserved unto the State of Texas for the use and benefit of the Permanent School Fund, provided, however, that in the event of discovery of oil or gas in said land, drilling operations thereon shall be restricted so that not more than one well productive of oil or gas shall be drilled for each one hundred sixty (160) productive acres, and all operations at each such well shall be confined to an area or areas of four (4) acres at and including the well site.

Sec. 3. CONFLICT OF CLAIMS OR BOUNDARIES. In the event of any conflict or claim of conflict between the boundaries of the tract of land described in such patent and the boundaries or claimed boundaries of previously validly titled land owned or claimed by private persons, the City of Corpus Christi is hereby authorized in its own behalf and as agent for the State of Texas to take proper action to resolve such conflict or claim of conflict, without cost or expense, however, to the State of Texas. Without limiting the authority of said City otherwise herein granted or which it has by reason of its ownership, said City is hereby authorized to file suit in the name of the State of Texas to secure a judicial determination of said boundaries; and said City is further authorized to establish the boundaries between the tract covered by said patent and any adjoining private owner or claimant by agreement, which boundary agreement or agreements shall be set forth in writing and shall be effective when approved by ordinance of said City adopted for such purpose. In the event of any change in the boundaries of said tract as a result of judicial decree or by agreement in accordance herewith, corrected field notes of said tract shall be filed in the General Land Office and a corrected patent shall be issued to the City of Corpus Christi, its successors and assigns, subject to the provisions of this Act.

Sec. 4. IMPROVEMENT OF LAND; TITLE TO LAND. The City of Corpus Christi, its agents or assigns shall improve such portions of the land covered by said patent or any corrected patent as such city, its agents or assigns, deems suitable and proper therefor. Such improvement shall consist of the raising or filling to a height of at least three (3) feet above the level of mean high tide, except for such part as may be devoted to channels, canals, or waterways. Title to any portion of such land (except that devoted to channels, canals, or waterways) that has not been so improved by filling to such height before July 1, 1977, shall revert to the State of Texas, and from and after that date neither said city nor its assigns shall have any right, title, claim, or interest to such portion which has not been so improved. No title shall revert, however, to the State of Texas as to any portion or portions which are filled to such height before July 1, 1977, including portions which are devoted to channels, canals, or waterways appurtenant to or used in connection with any portion so improved.

Sec. 5. POWERS OF CITY TO CONVEY OR RETAIN LAND; OTHER POWERS. Said city may retain all or any part of the land subject to this Act, and it may convey all or any part or parts of such land to others. As to each tract or parcel of land which the city conveys to another or others, each such conveyance or conveyances shall:

(A) Contain a condition subsequent, which shall provide that such grantee or grantees shall by the date specified in the conveyance, which date shall in no event be later than July 1, 1977, improve the particular tract or parcel of land included in such conveyance to the extent that it will be filled to a height of at least three (3) feet above mean high tide, except for such portions thereof as may be devoted to channels, canals, or waterways. If the date specified in the conveyance is a date prior to July 1, 1977, such condition subsequent shall provide that if said condition is breached, title to the tract or parcel of land covered by said conveyance that is not so improved (except for such portions as may be devoted to channels, canals, or waterways) shall revert to the City of Corpus Christi, and the right of reentry retained by said city in the conveyance shall be immediately exercised; and said city may thereafter retain such portion or portions of such tract or parcel, or may convey such portion or portions in the same manner as provided above. If the date specified in the conveyance is July 1, 1977, such condition subsequent shall provide if said condition is breached, title to such portion or portions of the tract or parcel of land covered by said conveyance that are not so improved (except for such portions as may be devoted to channels, canals, or waterways) shall revert to the State of Texas;

(B) Provide that such portion or portions of the tract or parcel of land covered by the conveyance which have been so improved, including such portions thereof as may be devoted to channels, canals, or waterways appurtenant to or used in connection with any portion so improved, shall, upon the written application to the City of Corpus Christi describing the improved area and the area devoted to channels, canals, or waterways appurtenant or used in connection therewith, be by the city by ordinance or resolution released of the condition subsequent and a proper recordable release shall be executed and delivered. Any such ordinance or resolution of said city shall be binding upon all parties concerned, including the State of Texas, as to the making of the improvements in accordance herewith; provided, however, that in the event the City of Corpus Christi conveys or leases all or any part of said land to any other person, persons, firms, corporation or entity of any nature, said city shall pay to the Texas Permanent Free School Fund a sum equal to one-half (1/2) of the reasonable market value thereof.

Sec. 6. PLANS AND CONTRACTS FOR IMPROVEMENTS; POWERS OF CITY. The City of Corpus Christi is hereby authorized to prepare or approve plans for the improvements covered by this Act, and to make and enter into such agreements or contracts relating to such improvements as in the judgment of the governing body thereof may be necessary or desirable, and such agreements or contracts may be with grantees or prospective grantees of all or any portion of the land subject to this Act, or other parties.

Sec. 7. REPEALER. The land subject to this Act, as identified in Section 1 hereof, shall henceforth be held subject to the provisions of this Act and all laws or parts of laws in conflict herewith are hereby repealed or modified to the extent of such conflict.

Sec. 8. LAW CUMULATIVE. This Act shall be and is cumulative of all former grants and authorities from the State of Texas to the City of Corpus Christi.

Acts 1961, 57th Leg., p. 1089, ch. 489.

Sec. 4 amended by Acts 1965, 59th Leg., p. 91, ch. 34, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1965; Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 1414, ch. 392, Sec. 1, eff. May 26, 1971.

Sec. 5 amended by Acts 1965, 59th Leg., p. 91, ch. 34, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 30, 1965; Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 1414, ch. 392, Sec. 2, eff. May 26, 1971.

Art. 5421l. CONTROL OF CERTAIN PROPERTY IN AUSTIN TRANSFERRED TO UNIVERSITY REGENTS. From and after the effective date of this Act the control and management of, and all rights, privileges, powers and duties in connection with the property owned by the State of Texas and located on the west side of Red River Street between East Nineteenth and Eighteenth Streets, being the East One-half (1/2) of Outlot No. Sixty-three (63), consisting of Lots Eight (8), Nine (9), Ten (10), Eleven (11), Twelve (12), Thirteen (13) and Fourteen (14) of Division "E" of the City of Austin, Travis County, Texas, which were formerly vested in and exercised by the State Board of Control, shall be transferred to, vested in, and exercised by the Board of Regents of The University of Texas, and hereafter, the aforesaid property shall be used for the purposes and activities of The University of Texas.

Acts 1947, 50th Leg., p. 472, ch. 272, Sec. 1.